South Dakota, session 2026, SB232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a moratorium is imposed
on any new construction or expansion of a hyperscale data center in this state. The
moratorium includes the expansion of any data center that is not currently a hyperscale
data center but, if expanded, would become a hyperscale data center.
The moratorium does not apply to any hyperscale data center that obtained all final
government approval and required permits, and executed all utility interconnection
agreements, before July 1, 2026.
The moratorium is in effect through June 30, 2027.
For purposes of this Act, "hyperscale data center" means a centralized repository:
(1) For for the storage, management, dissemination, and processing of electronic
data and information; and, which has two or more of the following:
(1) A size exceeding two hundred fifty thousand square feet;
(2) Having a A peak electrical demand of fifty megawatts or greater;
(3) An artificial intelligence model training or large-scale machine learning purpose; or
(4) A co-location configuration with undisclosed end-users.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.